Maine, session 132, LD1229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1015, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Contributions to gubernatorial and legislative candidates; no primary
election. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for the purposes of
contribution limits under subsections 1 and 2-B:
A. For a gubernatorial candidate who is not on a ballot in a primary election, the
contribution limit in any one election cycle is the same as a gubernatorial candidate
who is on the ballot in a primary election; and
B. For a legislative candidate who is not on a ballot in a primary election, the
contribution limit in any one election cycle is the same as a legislative candidate who
is on the ballot in a primary election.